Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.210

Types of permissible investments.

(1) Except to the extent otherwise limited by the director under RCW 19.230.200, the following investments are permissible for a money transmitter licensee under RCW 19.230.200:

(a) Cash on hand. Time deposits, savings deposits, demand deposits, certificates of deposit, or senior debt obligations of an insured depositary institution as defined in section 3 of the federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813) or as defined under the federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1781);

(b) Banker's acceptance or bill of exchange that is eligible for purchase upon endorsement by a member bank of the federal reserve system and is eligible for purchase by a federal reserve bank;

(c) An investment bearing a rating of one of the three highest grades as defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates securities;

(d) An investment security that is an obligation of the United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; an investment in an obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by the United States; or an investment in an obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof;

(e) Receivables that are payable to a licensee from its authorized delegates, in the ordinary course of business, pursuant to contracts which are not past due or doubtful of collection, if the aggregate amount of receivables under this subsection (1)(e) does not exceed thirty percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not hold, at one time, receivables under this subsection (1)(e) in any one person aggregating more than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible investments; and

(f) A share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the United States securities and exchange commission under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80(a)(1) through (64), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company's investment policy to investments specified in (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(2) The following investments are permissible under RCW 19.230.200, but only to the extent specified as follows:

(a) An interest-bearing bill, note, bond, or debenture of a person whose equity shares are traded on a national securities exchange or on a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this subsection (2)(a) does not exceed twenty percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not, at one time, hold investments under this subsection (2)(a) in any one person aggregating more than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible investments;

(b) A share of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market or a share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the United States securities and exchange commission under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80(a)(1) through (64), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company's investment policy to shares of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this subsection (2)(b) does not exceed twenty percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not, at one time, hold investments under this subsection (2)(b) in any one person aggregating more than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible investments;

(c) A demand-borrowing agreement made to a corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose securities are traded on a national securities exchange, if the aggregate of the amount of principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this subsection (2)(c) does not exceed twenty percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not, at one time, hold principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this subsection (2)(c) with any one person aggregating more than ten percent of the licensee's total permissible investments; and

(d) Any other investment the director designates, to the extent specified in rule by the director.

(3) The aggregate of investments under subsection (2) of this section may not exceed fifty percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee.

(4) A licensee may not use any portion of a restricted asset as a permissible investment. Restricted assets include, but are not limited to, surety bonds or any other assets pledged to other persons or entities. The director may establish by rule other restricted assets.

[ 2017 c 30 s 17; 2010 c 73 s 10; 2003 c 287 s 23.]